Montana, session 2025, HB10.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [this act], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Chief information officer" has the meaning provided in 2-17-506.
(2) "Information technology resource" has the meaning provided in 2-17-506.
(3) "Information technology capital project" means a group of interrelated information technology
activities that are planned and executed in a structured sequence to create a unique product or service.
(4) "LRITP" means the long-range information technology program account in the capital projects
fund type.
Section 2. Appropriations and authorizations. (1) (a) All business application systems funded
under this section must have a plan approved by the chief information officer for the system design,
implementation, and security of the data associated with the system.
(b) The security aspects of the plan must address but are not limited to the following:
(i) the authentication and granting of system privileges;
(ii) safeguards against unauthorized access to or disclosure of sensitive information; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 10
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 10
(iii) consistent with state records retention policies, plans for the removal of sensitive data from the
system when it is no longer needed.
(c) It is the intent of this subsection (1) that specific consideration be given to the potential sharing
of data with other state agencies in the design, definition, creation, storage, and security of the data.
(2) Funds may not be released for a project until the chief information officer and the budget
director approve the plans described in subsection (1) and review and approve results from requests for
proposals or similar procurement procedures and contract documents.
(3) The following money is appropriated to the department of administration to be used only for
listed information technology capital projects:
Agency/Project LRITP State Federal Proprietary Total
Special Special
Revenue Revenue
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION (DOA)
Projects include Enterprise Financial Warehouse, Enterprise Data Catalog, Recruiting and Onboarding
Modernization, eMACS/Jaegger Replacement, Cybersecurity Enhancements, eGov Modernization,
Infrastructure Upgrades and Expansion, Web Site Improvements (my.mt.gov and Prosperity Portal), Artificial
Intelligence and Legacy System Modernization (Technical Debt Relief Fund), Contact Center Technology
Replacement, and 508 Compliance (Web Content Accessibility Rule). Combined costs for these projects are:
22,653,700 22,653,700
21,753,700 21,753,700
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
The projects are Comprehensive Safety and Surveillance, Improvements and
MCE/Warehouse/Maintenance Enterprise Operations System.
3,111,000 3,111,000
OFFICE OF THE COMMISSIONER OF HIGHER EDUCATION
Projects include CyberMontana (Security Operations Center, Workforce Training Programs, Cyber
Policy Clinic), Security Information and Event Management (SIEM), Enterprise Resource Planning and System
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 10
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 10
Replacement (combined appropriation for Miles Community College, Flathead Valley Community College, and
Dawson Community College). Combined costs for these projects are:
5,018,360 5,018,360
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
The project is Museum Systems Operations and Management.
947,500 947,500
JUDICIAL
The project is Courts Electronic Filing System Architecture and Cybersecurity Refresh.
1,500,000 1,500,000
1,475,000 1,475,000
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES and CONSERVATION
Projects include Water Rights Information System Rewrite, GIS Migration, and Licensing and
Permitting System Replacement. Combined costs for these projects are:
4,965,000 4,965,000
4,890,000 4,890,000
OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER
The project is Statewide Courthouse Wi-Fi.
124,135 124,135
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH and HUMAN SERVICES
Projects include Child and Family Services Division -- Comprehensive Child Welfare Information
System Independent Verification and Validation Services, Child Support Services Division -- State Directory of
New Hires, Child and Family Services Division -- Montana Child Support Enforcement Automated System
Replacement Independent Verification and Validation Services, Human and Community Services Division --
Secure Data Connections for Montana Benefit Programs, Human and Community Services Division -- Public
Benefits System Efficiency Modernization, Human and Community Services Division -- Improving Timeliness of
Public Benefit Recipient Notifications, and Senior and Long-Term Care Division -- Legacy System
Replacements. Combined costs for these projects are:
1,830,651 6,065,155 7,895,806
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 10
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 10
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
The project is GenTax to AWS Hosted Environment
500,000 500,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Projects include Advanced Transportation Management System and Motor Fuels System. Combined
costs for these projects are:
7,500,000 7,500,000
Section 3. Transfer of funds. The state treasurer shall transfer $38,702,846 from the general fund to
the LRITP on an as-needed basis by June 30, 2027.
Section 4. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 10
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 10, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 10
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK
BY REQUEST OF THE OFFICE OF BUDGET AND PROGRAM PLANNING
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY CAPITAL PROJECTS;
APPROPRIATING MONEY FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY CAPITAL PROJECTS FOR THE BIENNIUM
ENDING JUNE 30, 2027; PROVIDING FOR MATTERS RELATING TO THE APPROPRIATIONS; PROVIDING
FOR A TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE LONG-RANGE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM ACCOUNT; PROVIDING FOR THE ACQUISITION, IMPLEMENTATION, AND
CONFIGURATION OF NEW INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS; PROMOTING STATEWIDE
NETWORKS EFFICIENCIES; PROVIDING DEFINITIONS; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”